District of Columbia statutes.
42-1213

Maintenance of office to be included in estimate of District appropriations; appropriations for building, equipment, and supplies authorized.

The annual estimates of appropriations for the government of the District of Columbia shall include estimates of appropriations for the operation and maintenance of the Office of the Recorder of Deeds. And appropriations are hereby authorized for a suitable record building for the Office of the Recorder of Deeds, and for personal services, rentals, office equipment, office supplies, and such other expenditures as are essential for the efficient maintenance and conduct of such office.

Apr. 24, 1926, 44 Stat. 322, ch. 176, § 2
1981 Ed., § 45-911.
1973 Ed., § 45-710.